Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.140

Special assessment roll—Public hearing—Notice—Contents.

Notice of the original public hearing on the proposed special assessment roll, and any public hearing held as a result of raising special assessments or including omitted property, shall be published and mailed to the owner or reputed owner of the property as provided in RCW 36.61.040 for the public hearing on the formation of the lake or beach management district. However, the notice need only provide the total amount to be collected by the special assessment roll and shall state that: (1) A public hearing on the proposed special assessment roll will be held, giving the time, date, and place of the public hearing; (2) the proposed special assessment roll is available for public perusal, giving the times and location where the proposed special assessment roll is available for public perusal; (3) objections to the proposed special assessment must be in writing, include clear grounds for objections, and must be filed prior to the public hearing; and (4) failure to so object shall be deemed to waive an objection.

Notices mailed to the owners or reputed owners shall additionally indicate the amount of special assessment ascribed to the particular lot, tract, parcel of land, or other property owned by the person so notified.

[ 2008 c 301 s 16; 1985 c 398 s 14.]